Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-184
Stanton.

The county of Stanton is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township twenty-one, north, of range one, east; thence east to the southeast corner of township twenty-one, north, of range three, east; thence north to the northeast corner of township twenty-four, north, of range three, east; thence west to the northwest corner of township twenty-four, north, of range one, east; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 50, p. 221;

R.S.1913, § 899;

C.S.1922, § 801;

C.S.1929, § 25-188;

R.S.1943, § 22-184.